Washington statutes.
RCW 35.73.030

Hearing—Time of—Publication of resolution.

Upon the passage of the resolution the city clerk shall cause it to be published in the official newspaper of the city in at least two successive issues before the time fixed in the resolution for filing protests. Proof of publication by affidavit shall be filed as part of the record of the proceedings.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.73.030. Prior: 1907 c 243 s 2, part; RRS s 9427, part.]